Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 1. Urban Development

§ 15-9-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Wyoming Urban Renewal Code.”

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-492; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-101

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cited

in

Kautza v. City of Cody, 812 P.2d 143,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1991).

§ 15-9-102.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared that there exists in municipalities of the state slum and blighted areas (as herein defined) which constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public health, safety, morals and welfare of the residents of the state; that the existence of such areas contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime, constitutes an economic and social liability imposing onerous municipal burdens which decrease the tax base and reduce tax revenues, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of municipalities, retards the provision of housing accommodations, aggravates traffic problems and substantially impairs or arrests the elimination of traffic hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities; and that the prevention and elimination of slums and blight is a matter of state policy and state concern.

It is further found and declared that certain slum or blighted areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance, and disposition subject to use restrictions, as provided in this act, since the prevailing conditions of decay may make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or rehabilitation; that other areas or portions thereof may, through the means provided in this act, be susceptible to conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils hereinbefore enumerated may be eliminated, remedied or prevented; and that salvageable slum and blighted areas can be conserved and rehabilitated through appropriate public action as herein authorized, and the cooperation and voluntary action of the owners and tenants of property in such areas.

It is further found and declared that the powers conferred by this act are for public uses and purposes for which public money may be expended and the power of eminent domain and police power exercised; and that the necessity in the public interest for the provisions herein enacted is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-493; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-102

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” appears to refer to the Wyoming Urban Renewal Code, which was enacted by Laws 1965, ch. 140, and which presently appears as §§

15-9-101

to

15-9-137

. See, also, §

15-9-101

.

§ 15-9-103.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the context:

“Agency” or “urban renewal agency” means a public agency created by W.S.

15-9-134

;

“Area of operation” means the area within the corporate limits of the municipality and the area within five (5) miles of those limits, except that it may include any area which lies within the territorial boundaries of another incorporated city or town if a resolution has been adopted by the governing body of the other city or town consenting to the inclusion and it may include any unincorporated area within five (5) miles of the corporate limits of the municipality if a resolution has been adopted by the county commissioners of the unincorporated area consenting to the inclusion;

“Blighted area” means an area which by reason of the presence of a substantial number of slums, deteriorated or deteriorating structures, predominance of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility or usefulness, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity of ownership, tax or special assessments, delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, defective or unusual conditions of title, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of those factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a municipality, retards the provision of housing accommodations or constitutes an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals or welfare in its present condition and use. However, if the blighted area consists of open land, the conditions contained in W.S. 15-9-110(b) apply and any disaster area referred to in W.S.

15-9-112

constitutes a “blighted area”;

“Bonds” means any bonds, notes, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness, debentures or other obligations;

“Clerk” means the clerk or other official of the municipality who is the custodian of the official records of the municipality;

“Council” or “commission” means a council, board, commission, department, division, office, body or other unit of the municipality;

“Federal government” means the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality thereof;

“Local governing body” means the commission, council or other legislative body charged with governing the municipality;

“Mayor” means the mayor of a municipality or other officer or body having the duties customarily imposed upon the executive head of a municipality;

“Municipality” means any incorporated or chartered city or town as established under Wyoming law;

“Obligee” means any bondholder, agents or trustees for any bondholders, or lessor demising to the municipality, property used in connection with an urban renewal project, or any assignee or assignees of the lessor’s interest or any part thereof, and the federal government if it is a party to any contract with the municipality;

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee or other person acting in a similar representative capacity;

“Public body” means the state, or any county, municipality, board, commission, authority, district or any other subdivision or public body thereof;

“Public officer” means any officer who is in charge of any department or branch of the government of the municipality relating to health, fire, building regulations or any other activities concerning dwellings in the municipality;

“Real property” means all lands, including improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every estate, interest, right and use therein, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage or otherwise;

“Slum area” means an area in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whether residential or nonresidential, which by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of those factors is conducive to ill health and is detrimental to the public safety, morals or welfare;

“Urban renewal area” means a slum area or a blighted area or a combination thereof which the local governing body designates as appropriate for an urban renewal project;

“Urban renewal plan” means a plan, as it exists from time to time, for one (1) or more urban renewal areas, or for any urban renewal project, which:

Conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a whole, except as provided in W.S.

15-9-112

, and is consistent with definite local objectives respecting appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities and other public improvements; and

Is sufficiently complete to indicate land acquisition, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements and rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the urban renewal area, zoning and planning changes, if any, land used, maximum densities and building requirements.

“Urban renewal project” includes undertakings and activities of a municipality in one (1) or more urban renewal areas for the elimination and for the prevention of the development or spread of slums and blight, and may involve slum clearance and redevelopment in an urban renewal area, or rehabilitation or conservation in an urban renewal area, or any combination or part thereof in accordance with an urban renewal plan. The undertakings and activities may include:

Acquisition of a slum area or a blighted area or portion thereof;

Demolition and removal of buildings and improvements;

Installation, construction or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds and other improvements necessary for carrying out in the urban renewal area the urban renewal objectives of this chapter in accordance with the urban renewal plan;

Disposition of any property acquired in the urban renewal area at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan;

Carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements in accordance with the urban renewal plan; and

Acquisition of any other real property in the urban renewal area if necessary to eliminate unhealthy, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, lessen density, eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, or otherwise to remove or prevent the spread of blight or deterioration or to provide land for needed public facilities.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-494; Laws 1969, ch. 157, §§ 4, 5; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-103

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2018 ch. 83, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

effective January 1, 2019,
in (a)(ii), substituted “except that it may include”
for “except that it does not include,” “city
or town if a resolution” for “city or town unless a
resolution,” and “town consenting to the inclusion and
it may include any unincorporated area within five (5) miles of the
corporate limits of the municipality if a resolution has been adopted
by the county commissioners of the unincorporated area consenting
to the inclusion” for “town declaring a need therefor.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-9-104.
Private enterprise to be preferred; when considered.

A municipality, to the greatest extent it determines to be feasible in carrying out the provisions of this chapter and consistent with its needs, shall afford maximum opportunity to the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban renewal area by private enterprise. A municipality shall give consideration to this objective in exercising its powers under this chapter, including the:

Formulation of a workable program;

Approval of communitywide plans or programs for urban renewal and general neighborhood renewal plans (consistent with the general plan of the municipality);

Exercising of its zoning powers;

Enforcement of other laws, codes and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements;

Disposition of any property acquired; and

Provision of necessary public improvements.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-495; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-104

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statutes providing for urban redevelopment by private enterprise, 44 ALR2d 1414.

§ 15-9-105.
Workable program; formulation; objectives and provisions thereof.

For the purposes of this chapter a municipality may formulate for itself a workable program for utilizing appropriate private and public resources to:

Eliminate and prevent the development or spread of slums and urban blight;

Encourage needed urban rehabilitation;

Provide for the redevelopment of slum and blighted areas; or

Undertake any of those activities or other feasible municipal activities as may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of a workable program.

A workable program may include provisions for the:

Prevention of the spread of blight through diligent enforcement of housing, zoning and occupancy controls and standards;

Rehabilitation or conservation of slum and blighted areas or portions thereof by:

Replanning;

Removing congestion;

Providing parks, playgrounds and other public improvements;

Encouraging voluntary rehabilitation; and

Compelling the repair and rehabilitation of deteriorated or deteriorating structures.

Clearance and redevelopment of slum and blighted areas or portions thereof.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-496; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-105

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-106.
Initiative resolution; how adopted; findings.

No municipality shall exercise the authority conferred upon municipalities by this chapter until the local governing body, on its own motion or by virtue of a petition signed by twenty-five (25) or more electors of the municipality, has adopted a resolution finding that:

One (1) or more slum or blighted areas exist in the municipality; and

The rehabilitation, conservation, redevelopment or a combination thereof of the area or areas is necessary in the interest of the public health, safety, morals or welfare of the residents of the municipality.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-497; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-106

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 15-9-107.
Preliminary requirements for projects; generally.

An urban renewal project for an urban renewal area shall not be planned or initiated unless the governing body, by resolution, has determined the area to be a slum area or a blighted area or a combination thereof and designated it as appropriate for an urban renewal project. A municipality shall not acquire real property for any urban renewal project unless the local governing body has approved the urban renewal project in accordance with W.S.

15-9-110

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-498; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-107

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-108.
Preliminary requirements for projects; preparation of plan; review by commission.

A municipality may prepare an urban renewal plan or have one prepared by the urban renewal agency established in W.S.

15-9-134

. Any person or agency may also submit an urban renewal plan to a municipality. Prior to approving an urban renewal project, the local governing body shall submit the urban renewal plan to the planning commission of the municipality, if any, for review and recommendations as to its conformity with the general plan for the development of the entire municipality. The planning commission shall submit its written recommendations with respect to the proposed urban plan to the local governing body within thirty (30) days after receipt of the plan for review. Upon receipt of the planning commission recommendations, or if no recommendations are received within thirty (30) days, the local governing body may proceed with the hearing on the proposed urban renewal project in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

15-9-109

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-499; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-108

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-109.
Preliminary requirements for projects; hearing; publication and contents of notice.

The local governing body, under rules or procedures it determines, shall hold a public hearing on any urban renewal project.

A notice of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation of the municipality for two (2) successive weeks, with the last publication thereof to be at least five (5) days prior to the hearing. The notice shall:

Describe the time, date, place and purpose of the hearing;

Generally identify the urban renewal area covered by the plan; and

Outline the general scope of the urban renewal project under consideration.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-500; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-109

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-110.
Preliminary requirements for projects; approval by and findings of governing body.

Following the hearing specified in W.S.

15-9-109

, the local governing body may approve an urban renewal project and the plan therefor if it finds that:

A feasible method exists for the relocation of families who will be displaced from the urban renewal area in decent, safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations within their means and without undue hardship to those families;

The urban renewal plan conforms to the general plan of the municipality as a whole;

The urban renewal plan gives due consideration to the provision of adequate park and recreational areas and facilities that may be desirable for neighborhood improvement, with special consideration for the health, safety and welfare of children residing in the general vicinity of the site covered by the plan;

The urban renewal plan affords maximum opportunity, consistent with the municipality’s needs, for the rehabilitation or redevelopment of the urban renewal area by private enterprise.

If the urban renewal area consists of an area of open land to be acquired by the municipality, the area shall not be so acquired unless:

If it is to be developed for residential uses, the local governing body shall determine that:

A shortage of housing of sound standards and design which is decent, safe and sanitary exists in the municipality;

The need for housing accommodations has been or will be increased as a result of the clearance of slums in other areas;

The conditions of blight in the area and the shortage of decent, safe and sanitary housing cause or contribute to an increase in and spread of disease and crime and constitute a menace to the public health, safety, morals or welfare; and

The acquisition of the area for residential uses is an integral part of and essential to the program of the municipality;

If it is to be developed for nonresidential uses, the local governing body shall determine that the:

Nonresidential uses are necessary and appropriate to facilitate the proper growth and development of the community in accordance with sound planning standards and local community objectives;

Acquisition may require the exercise of governmental action as provided in this chapter, because of:

Defective or unusual conditions of title;

Diversity of ownership;

Tax delinquency;

Improper subdivisions;

Outmoded street patterns;

Deterioration of site;

Economic disuse;

Unsuitable topography or faulty lot layouts;

Need for the correlation of the area with other areas of a municipality by streets and modern traffic requirements; or

Any combination of factors specified in this subparagraph or other conditions which retard development of the area.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 10; W.S. 1975, § 15.1-501; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-110

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-111.
When plan modifiable and effective.

An urban renewal plan may be modified at any time. If a plan is modified after the lease or sale by the municipality of real property in the urban renewal project area, the modification may be conditioned upon the approval of the owner, lessee or successor in interest as the municipality deems advisable. The modification is subject to any rights at law or in equity as a lessee or purchaser, or his successor or successors in interest, are entitled to assert.

Upon the approval by a municipality of an urban renewal plan or of any modification thereof, the plan or modification is deemed to be in full force and effect, and the municipality may then cause the plan or modification to be carried out in accordance with its terms.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, §§ 11, 12; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-502, 15.1-503; W.S. 1977, §§

15-10-111

,

15-10-112

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-112.
Provisions not applicable for disaster area.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if a local governing body certifies that an area is in need of redevelopment or rehabilitation as a result of a flood, fire, tornado, earthquake, storm or other catastrophe for which the governor of the state has certified the need for disaster assistance under 42 U.S.C. 5121 et seq., or other federal law, the local governing body may approve an urban renewal plan and an urban renewal project for that area without regard to the provisions of W.S.

15-9-109

and the provisions of this act requiring a general plan for the municipality and a public hearing on the urban renewal project.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-504; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-113

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 302.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “42 U.S.C. 5121 et seq.” for “Public Law 875, eighty-first congress.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” appears to refer to the Wyoming Urban Renewal Code, which was enacted by Laws 1965, ch. 140, and which presently appears as §§

15-9-101

to

15-9-137

. See, also, §

15-9-101

.

Federal provisions. —

Public Law 875, eighty-first congress, referred to in this section, has been repealed. For present provisions as to disaster relief, see 42 U.S.C. § 5121 et seq.

§ 15-9-113.
General powers of municipality.

In addition to any other powers specified by law, every municipality has all the powers necessary to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the following powers:

To undertake and carry out urban renewal projects and related activities within its area of operation; and to:

Make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this act;

Disseminate slum clearance and urban renewal information.

To provide or to arrange or contract for the furnishing or repair by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities or other facilities for or in connection with an urban renewal project;

To install, construct and reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds and other public improvements;

To agree to any conditions that it deems reasonable and appropriate attached to federal financial assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor standards, in the undertaking or carrying out of an urban renewal project and related activities and to include in any contract let in connection with such a project and related activities, provisions to fulfill those conditions as it deems reasonable and appropriate;

Within its area of operation, to enter into any building or property in any urban renewal area in order to make inspections, surveys, appraisals, soundings or test borings, and to obtain an order for this purpose from a court of competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted as provided by law;

To acquire by purchase, lease, option, gift, grant, bequest, devise, eminent domain or otherwise, any real property (or personal property for its administrative purposes) together with any improvements thereon and to hold, improve, clear or prepare for redevelopment any such property;

To mortgage, pledge, hypothecate or otherwise encumber or dispose of any real property;

To insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property;

To enter into any contracts necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act;

To invest any urban renewal project funds held in reserves or sinking funds or any such funds not required for immediate disbursement in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control, or to deposit in savings accounts in national or state banks and to redeem any bonds issued pursuant to W.S.

15-9-119

at the redemption price established therein or to purchase those bonds at less than redemption price, all such bonds so redeemed or purchased to be cancelled;

To borrow money and to apply for and accept any form of financial assistance from any source for the purposes of this chapter, to give such security as may be required, to enter into and carry out contracts or agreements in connection therewith and to include in any contract for financial assistance with the federal government for or with respect to any urban renewal project and related activities such conditions imposed pursuant to federal laws as the municipality deems reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter;

Within its area of operation, to make or have made all surveys and plans necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter and to contract with any person, public or private, in making and carrying out those plans and to adopt or approve, modify and amend those plans, which plans may include but are not limited to:

A general plan for the locality as a whole;

Urban renewal plans;

Plans for carrying out a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements;

Plans for the enforcement of state and local laws, codes, ordinances and regulations relating to the use of land, the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition or removal of buildings and improvements; and

Perform or contract the performance of appraisals, title searches, surveys, studies and other plans and work necessary to prepare for the undertaking of urban renewal projects and related activities, to develop, test and report methods and techniques and carry out demonstrations and other activities for the prevention and the elimination of slums and urban blight.

To prepare plans for and assist in the relocation of any persons displaced by an urban renewal project, and to make relocation payments to or with respect to those persons for moving expenses and losses of property for which reimbursement or compensation is not otherwise made, including the making of such payments financed by the federal government;

To appropriate funds, make expenditures and levy taxes and assessments as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this act;

To zone or rezone any part of the municipality or make exceptions from building regulations;

To enter into agreements with an urban renewal agency vested with urban renewal project power under W.S.

15-9-133

, which agreements may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary, respecting action to be taken by a municipality pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter;

To close, vacate, plan or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways or other places;

To plan or replan any part of the municipality;

Within its area of operation, to organize, coordinate and direct the administration of the provisions of this act as they apply to the municipality in order that the objective of remedying slum and blighted areas and preventing the causes thereof within the municipality may be most effectively promoted and achieved and to establish new offices of the municipality or to reorganize existing offices in order to carry out the purpose most effectively;

To exercise all or any part or combination of powers granted by this section; and

To plan and undertake neighborhood development programs consisting of urban renewal project undertakings and activities in one (1) or more urban renewal areas which are planned and carried out on the basis of annual increments in accordance with the provisions of this chapter for planning and carrying out urban renewal projects.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-505; Laws 1969, ch. 157, § 6; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-114

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act” appears to refer to the Wyoming Urban Renewal Code, which was enacted by Laws 1965, ch. 140, and which presently appears as §§

15-9-101

to

15-9-137

. See, also, §

15-9-101

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What projects involve work subject to state statutes requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 10 ALR5th 337.

Employees' private right of action to enforce state statute requiring payment of prevailing wages on public works projects, 10 ALR5th 360.

§ 15-9-114.
Condemnation.

A municipality has the right to acquire by condemnation any interest in real property, including a fee simple title thereto, which it deems necessary for or in connection with an urban renewal project under this chapter. A municipality may exercise the power of eminent domain in the manner now provided or which may be hereafter provided by any other statutory provisions. Property already devoted to a public use may be acquired in like manner, provided that no real property belonging to the United States, the state or any political subdivision thereof, may be acquired without its consent.

In any proceeding to fix compensation for damages for the taking or damaging of property, or any interest therein, through the exercise of the power of eminent domain or condemnation, evidence or testimony bearing upon the following matters is admissible and shall be considered, in addition to evidence or testimony otherwise admissible, in fixing the compensation for damages:

Any use, condition, occupancy or operation of the property, which is unlawful or violative of or subject to elimination, abatement, prohibition or correction under any law or any ordinance or regulatory measure of the state, county, municipality, other political subdivisions or any agency thereof, in which the property is located, as being unsafe, substandard, unsanitary or otherwise contrary to the public health, safety or welfare;

The effect on the value of the property of any such use, condition, occupancy or operation, or of the elimination, abatement, prohibition or correction of any such use, condition, occupancy or operation.

The testimony or evidence specified in subsection (b) of this section is admissible notwithstanding that no action has been taken by any public body or public office toward the abatement, prohibition, elimination or correction of any such use, condition, occupancy or operation. Testimony or evidence that any public body or public office charged with the duty or authority so to do has rendered, made or issued any judgment, decree, determination or order for the abatement, prohibition, elimination or correction of any such use, condition, occupancy or operation is admissible and is prima facie evidence of the existence and character of that use, condition or operation.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-506; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-115

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

§ 15-9-115.
Property acquired in project; disposition and use generally.

A municipality may:

Sell, lease or otherwise transfer real property or any interest therein acquired by it in an urban renewal project;

Enter into contracts with respect to such property for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, educational or other uses or for public use; or

Retain the property or interest for public use in accordance with the urban renewal plan, subject to any covenants, conditions and restrictions, including covenants running with the land, as it deems necessary or desirable to assist in preventing the development or spread of future slums or blighted areas or to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The sale, lease, other transfer or retention of property specified in subsection (a) of this section, and any agreement relating thereto, may be made only after the local governing body approves the urban renewal plan.

The purchasers or lessees and their successors and assigns are obliged to devote the real property only to the uses specified in the urban renewal plan and may be obligated to comply with any other requirements the municipality determines to be in the public interest, including the obligation to begin within a reasonable time any improvements on the real property required by the urban renewal plan. With respect to any real property in an urban renewal area acquired by any public body, political subdivision, agency or office of the state for uses in accordance with an urban renewal plan, the public body, political subdivision, agency or office of the state is authorized to obligate itself and its successors or assigns to devote the real property only to the uses specified in the urban renewal plan and, to the extent funds have been authorized or appropriated, to obligate itself to begin improvements required by the urban renewal plan.

The real property or interest shall be sold, leased, otherwise transferred or retained at not less than its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan. In determining the fair value, a municipality shall give consideration to:

The uses provided therein;

The restrictions upon and the conditions and obligations assumed by the purchaser or lessee or by the municipality retaining the property; and

The objectives of the plan for the prevention of the recurrence of slum or blighted areas.

The municipality in any instrument of conveyance to a private purchaser or lessee may provide that the purchaser or lessee is without power to sell, lease or otherwise transfer the real property without the prior written consent of the municipality until he has completed the construction of any improvements which he is obligated to construct thereon. Real property acquired by a municipality which is to be transferred in accordance with the provisions of the urban renewal plan, shall be transferred as rapidly as feasible in the public interest consistent with carrying out of the provisions of the plan. Any contract for the transfer and the urban renewal plan shall be recorded in the land records of the county in the manner provided by law to afford actual or constructive notice thereof.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-507; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-116

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-116.
Property acquired in project; disposition to private persons; procedure; notice; proposals; contracts.

A municipality may:

Dispose of real property in an urban renewal area to private persons only under reasonable procedures it prescribes or as are provided in this section;

By notice published once each week for four (4) consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the community, prior to the execution of any contract to sell, lease or otherwise transfer real property and prior to the delivery of any instrument of conveyance with respect thereto under the provisions of this section, invite proposals from and make available all pertinent information to private redevelopers or any persons interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate an urban renewal area or any part thereof. The notice shall:

Identify the area or portion thereof;

State that:

Proposals shall be made by those interested within thirty (30) days after the last day of publication of the notice; and

Information as is available may be obtained at the office designated in the notice.

The municipality shall consider all redevelopment or rehabilitation proposals and the financial and legal ability of the persons making the proposals to carry them out. The municipality may accept any proposals it deems to be in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter. A notification of intention to accept a proposal shall be filed with the governing body not less than thirty (30) days prior to acceptance. Thereafter the municipality may execute a contract and deliver deeds, leases and other instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate a contract in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

15-9-115

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-508; W.S. 1977, §

15-10-117

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-117.
Property acquired in project; temporary operation and maintenance.

A municipality may temporarily operate and maintain real property acquired by it in an urban renewal area for or in connection with an urban renewal project pending the disposition of the property as authorized in this chapter, without regard to the provisions of W.S.

15-9-115

, for any uses and purposes it deems desirable even though not in conformity with the urban renewal plan.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-509; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-118; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-9-118.
Property acquired in project; disposition when area designated under federal provisions.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, if the municipality is situated in an area designated as a redevelopment area under the Federal Area Redevelopment Act 42 U.S.C. 3161 et seq., land in an urban renewal project area designated under the urban renewal plan for industrial or commercial uses may be disposed of to any public body or nonprofit corporation for subsequent disposition as promptly as practicable by the public body or corporation for redevelopment in accordance with the urban renewal plan. Only the purchaser from or lessee of the public body or corporation, and their assignees, are required to assume the obligation of beginning the building of improvements within a reasonable time. Any disposition of land to a public body or corporation under this section shall be made at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-510; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-119; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 302.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “42 U.S.C. 3161 et seq.” for “(Public Law 87-27).”

Redevelopment Act. —

The Federal Area Redevelopment Act, referred to in this section, has been omitted from the United States Code. The provisions are now covered by 42 U.S.C. § 3121 et seq.

§ 15-9-119.
Bonds authorized; payment thereof; security.

A municipality is empowered to issue:

Revenue bonds to finance the undertaking of any urban renewal project under this chapter, including, without limiting the generality thereof, the payment of principal and interest upon any advances for surveys and plans or preliminary loans; and

Refunding bonds for the payment or retirement of bonds previously issued by it.

The bonds shall be made payable solely from the income, proceeds and revenues derived from the municipality’s undertaking and carrying out of urban renewal projects under this chapter. However, payment of the bonds may be further secured by a pledge of any loan, grant or contribution from the federal government or other source in aid of any urban renewal projects of the municipality under this chapter.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 140, § 20; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-511; Laws 1969, ch. 157, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 15-10-120; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.